Utah statutes.
59-2-903.   Remittance to credit of Uniform School Fund of money in excess
of basic state-supported school program -- Manner.
In providing for remittance to the State Board of Education of any excess
collections from the tax levy applied for the basic state-supported school
program as specified in Subsection 59-2-902(4), the excess amount shall be
remitted in the following manner:
(1)  by June 1, 95% of the amount by which the money then collected, pursuant
to the levy, exceeds the estimated total basic state-supported school program
of the district; or
(2)  as soon after the end of the school year as the school district and the
State Board of Education can determine the actual cost of the district's basic
state-supported school program, the district and the State Board of Education
shall make a final settlement.
